Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.051

Warrants for pay of employees—Payment of.

Upon presentation to the state treasurer of a warrant drawn as provided for in RCW 44.04.050, that officer shall pay the same from any money in the state treasury appropriated for the expenses of the legislature of the state of Washington: PROVIDED, That should there be no money in the treasury of the state covered by such appropriation, the state treasurer shall indorse such fact on the warrant presented, and said warrant shall draw interest from date of such indorsement and shall be payable thereafter as is provided by law and custom.

[ 1890 p 3 s 2; RRS s 8149. Formerly RCW 44.04.070, part.]